Wisconsin, session 2025, SB565.
do enact as follows:SB565,11Section 1. 118.019 (2d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,2,92118.019 (2d) Nondiscrimination. An instructional program under this 3section shall use instructional methods and materials that, consistent with s. 4118.13 (1), do not discriminate against a pupil based upon the pupil’s race, gender, 5religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or ethnic or cultural 6background or against sexually active pupils or children with disabilities. Nothing 7in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit a school board from approving an 8instructional program under this section that includes instruction on abstinence 9from sexual activity or that is abstinence-centered.SB565,210Section 2. 118.13 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,3,511118.13 (1) Except as provided in sub. (1m) and s. 120.13 (37m), no person may 12be denied admission to any public school or a private school participating in a 13program under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 or be denied participation in, be 1denied the benefits of, or be discriminated against in any curricular, 2extracurricular, pupil services, recreational or other program or activity because of 3the person’s sex, race, religion, national origin, ancestry, creed, pregnancy, marital 4or parental status, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or 5physical, mental, emotional, or learning disability.SB565,36Section 3. 118.13 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB565,3,107118.13 (1m) (a) 1. With respect to being denied admission to, being denied 8participation in, being denied the benefits of, or being discriminated against on the 9basis of sex, sub. (1) does not apply to a private school participating in a program 10under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 that limits admission to pupils of only one sex.SB565,3,14112. Notwithstanding subd. 1., a private school participating in a program 12under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 that limits admission to pupils of only one sex 13may not deny admission to a pupil if the sex to which admissions are limited is the 14sex that is most consistent with the pupil’s gender identity.SB565,3,1815(b) With respect to discrimination on the basis of religion, sub. (1) does not 16apply to a sectarian private school participating in a program under s. 115.7915, 17118.60, or 119.23 declining to provide instruction in the tenets of a religion that is 18different from the religion with which the private school is affiliated.SB565,419Section 4. 118.13 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,4,420118.13 (2) (a) Each school board and each governing body of a private school 21participating in a program under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 shall develop 22written policies and procedures to implement this section and submit them to the 23state superintendent as a part of its 1986 annual report under s. 120.18. The 1policies and procedures shall provide for receiving and investigating complaints by 2residents of the school district regarding possible violations of this section, for 3making determinations as to whether this section has been violated and for 4ensuring compliance with this section.SB565,55Section 5. 118.13 (3) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,4,96118.13 (3) (a) 3. Include in the department’s biennial report under s. 15.04 (1) 7(d) information on the status of school district compliance with this section and 8school district progress toward providing reasonable equality of educational 9opportunity for all pupils in this state.SB565,610Section 6. 118.13 (3) (b) 1. and 2. of the statutes are amended to read:SB565,4,1411118.13 (3) (b) 1. Periodically review school district programs, activities and 12services to determine whether the school boards and governing bodies of private 13schools participating in a program under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 are 14complying with this section.SB565,4,17152. Assist school boards and governing bodies of private schools participating 16in a program under s. 115.7915, 118.60, or 119.23 to comply with this section by 17providing information and technical assistance upon request.SB565,718Section 7. 118.13 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,4,2219118.13 (4) Any public school or private school official, employee, or teacher 20who intentionally engages in conduct which discriminates against a person or 21causes a person to be denied rights, benefits, or privileges, in violation of sub. (1), 22may be required to forfeit not more than $1,000.SB565,823Section 8. 118.20 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,5,101118.20 (1) No discrimination because of sex, except where sex is a bona fide 2occupational qualification as defined in s. 111.36 (2), race, nationality, gender 3identity, gender expression, or political or religious affiliation may be practiced in 4the employment of teachers or administrative personnel in public schools or in their 5assignment or reassignment. No questions of any nature or form relative to sex, 6except where sex is a bona fide occupational qualification as defined in s. 111.36 (2), 7race, nationality, gender identity, gender expression, or political or religious 8affiliation may be asked applicants for teaching or administrative positions in the 9public schools either by public school officials or employees or by teachers agencies 10or placement bureaus.SB565,911Section 9. 118.40 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB565,5,1612118.40 (4) (b) 2. Except as provided in sub. (3) (h), discriminate in admission 13or deny participation in any program or activity on the basis of a person’s sex, race, 14religion, national origin, ancestry, pregnancy, marital or parental status, sexual 15orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or physical, mental, emotional or 16learning disability.SB565,5,1717